src/fin-lex.txt
Multichar_Symbols
 +N +A +Adv +V
 +Pron +CS +CC +Interj +Pcle
 +Pers +Dem +Interr +Refl +Recipr +Rel +Indef
 +Sg +Pl +Nom +Acc +Gen +Ine +Ill +Ela +Abe +All +Abl
 +Ess +Tra +Ins +Com +Par
 +Comp +Superl +Clt
 +Pass +Ind +Prs +Prt +Imprt +Cond +Pot
 +Inf  +PrsPrc +PrfPrc +Inf3
 +CLB +PUNCT +HYPH
 p1 t1 k1
 i2 i3 14 i5
 %^V %^A %^O %^U

 X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9
 Y1 Y2 Y3 Y4 Y5 Y6 Y7 Y8 Y9
 Z1 Z2 Z3 Z4 Z5 Z6 Z7 Z8 Z9
 %^TES

! Documenting the diacritics
! X1 WeG
! X2 WeG and a:0 sodissa
! X4 WeG matto - maton
! Y1 WeG and a:o rannoissa
! Y2 a:0 koira - koiria
! Y3 a:o kala - kaloja
! Y4 ':0 parfait'n : parfait
! Y5 m:n and i:0 lumi - lunta
! Y6 s:t and i:e käsi - käteen
! Y7 e:0 in cns stems käsi - kättä
! Z1 e:i in nom.sg
! Z2 i:0 i-stems in par,gen pl

! i2 plural i of nouns
! i3 past tense i of verbs
! i4 superlative i of adjectives
! i5 i in conditional isi of verbs
! ^¤ potecting against e:i word-finally (nalle, liike)

! =================================================
! Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files
! =================================================
  
LEXICON Root
 NounRoot ;
 ProperNoun ;
 AdjectiveRoot ;
 VerbRoot ;
 Adverb ;
 Subjunction ;
 Conjunction ;
 Preposition ;
 Interjection ;
! Pronoun ;
! Numeral ;
! Punctuation ;

! ======================
! Sublexica for NounRoot
! ======================


LEXICON 1 ! valo
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 2 ! palvelu
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 3 ! valtio
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 4 ! laatikko 
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:X4%>i2 shortillpl ; ! laatikoihin
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;  ! laatikkoihin

LEXICON 5 ! risti
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:Z2%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 6 ! paperi, banaani
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 7 ! ovi
 +N:Z1 nom-strong ; ! 
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N:X1 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 8 ! nalle
 +N:%^¤ strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 oldgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 9 ! kala
 +N: nom-strong ;
 +Sg+Nom: Px ;
 +Sg+Gen: Px ;
 +Sg+Acc: Px ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>n%^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:Y3%>i2%>n%^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg:Y3%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 com ;
 +N:Y1 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 oldgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortillpl ;


LEXICON 10 ! koira = 9, the diff is in twol-fin
 +N: nom-strong ;
 +Sg+Nom: Px ;
 +Sg+Gen: Px ;
 +Sg+Acc: Px ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>n%^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:Y2%>i2%>n%^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg:Y2%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 com ;
 +N:X2 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 oldgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 11 ! omena
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 oldgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y2%>i2 shortillpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 12 ! kulkija
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 oldgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 13 ! katiska
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N: short-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 oldgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y3%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 18 ! maa
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N: long-par ;
 +N: long-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 19 ! suo
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N: long-par ;
 +N: long-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 20 ! filee
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N: long-par ;
 +N: long-ill ;
 +N: longer-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longerillpl ;

LEXICON 21 ! rosé
 +N: strong-v-stem ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N: long-par ;
 +N: long-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 d-longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 22 ! parfait
 +N:'Y4 strong-v-stem ;
 +N:' weak-v-stem ;
 +N:' long-par ;
 +N:' long-ill ;
 +N+Pl:'%>i2 d-longgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:'%>i2 longparpl ;
 +N+Pl:'%>i2 shortillpl ;

LEXICON 24 ! uni
 +N:Z1 nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N:X1 weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 25 ! toimi
 +N:Z1 nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N:X1 weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ; ! tointa
 +N: short-par ; ! toimea
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 27 ! käsi
 +N:Z1 nom-strong ; ! käsi
 +N: gae-strong ; ! kätenä
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ; ! käsineen
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ; ! käden
 +N:Y7 long-par ; ! kättä
 +N: short-ill ; ! käteen
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ; ! käsien
 +N+Pl:Y7 consgenpl ; ! kätten
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ; !käsiä
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ; ! käsiin


LEXICON 28 ! kynsi
 +N:Z1 nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N:X4 weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y7 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;


LEXICON 29 ! lapsi
 +N:Z1 nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 30 ! veitsi
 29 ;
 ! why is 30 a separate lexicon?
 ! PS has lasten, lapsien but
 ! veitsien, veisten. Thus, the same
 ! forms, but a different order (!)

LEXICON 32 ! sisar 
 +N: nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 33 ! kytkin
 +N: nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 38 ! nainen
 +N: nom-strong ;
 +N: gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 39 ! vastaus
 +N:s npg-cns ;
 +N:kse gae-strong ;
 +N+Sg:kse%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:kse%>i2 com ;
 +N:kse weak-v-stem ;
 +N:kseY5 long-par ;
 +N:kse short-ill ;
! +N:ks
 +N+Pl:kse%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:kse%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:kse%>i2 shorterillpl ;

LEXICON 40 ! kalleus
 +N: nom-trunc ;
! +N:  ;
 +N+Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 com ;
 +N: weak-v-stem ;
 +N:Y5 long-par ;
 +N: short-ill ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:Y5 consgenpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shortparpl ;
 +N+Pl:%>i2 shorterillpl ;



!LEXICON 41 ! vieras

!LEXICON 42 ! mies

!LEXICON 43 ! ohut

!LEXICON 44 ! kevät

!LEXICON 45 ! ! kahdeksas

!LEXICON 46 ! tuhat

!LEXICON 47 ! kuollut

!LEXICON 48 ! hame

!LEXICON 49 ! askel

!LEXICON 50 ! isoäiti
! 5 ; ! "iso" is not inflected.

!LEXICON 51 ! nuoripari
! nuorenparin
! nuortaparia
! nuoreenpariin
! This is problematic, we need flags.







! Basic paradigms
! ===============

! Basic vowel stems
! -----------------

LEXICON strong-v-stem
 nom-strong ;
 gae-strong ;
 +Sg:%>i2 com ;
 +Pl:%>i2 com ;

LEXICON weak-v-stem
 +Sg+Gen:%>n K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom: t-PxK ;
 +Pl+Acc: t-PxK ;
 +Pl+Ins:%>i2%>n K ;
 +Pl+Ins:%>i2 Px ;
 +Sg: sgpl-cases ;    ! these two lexica for cases with
 +Pl:%>i2 sgpl-cases ; ! the same affix in sg and pl


! Sublexica for the vowel stems
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON nom-strong
 +Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON nom-trunc ! kalleus etc.
 +Sg+Nom:%^TES ;

LEXICON gae-strong
 +Sg+Nom: Px ;
 +Sg+Gen: Px ;
 +Sg+Acc: Px ;
 +Sg+Ess:%>n%^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:%>i2%>n%^A PxK ;
 
LEXICON sgpl-cases
 +Ine:%>ss%^A PxxK ;
 +Ela:%>st%^A PxxK ;
 +Ade:%>ll%^A PxxK ;
 +All:%>lle PxxK ;
 +Abl:%>lt%^A PxxK ;
 +Tra:%>ksi K ;
 +Tra:%>kse Pxx ;
 +Abe:%>tt%^A PxK ;

LEXICON com
 +Com:%>ne Pxx ; ! Not to K, since Px must be present
                 ! Note that adjectives nave -ine without Px


! Lexica for the non-uniform cases
! --------------------------------

LEXICON short-par
 +Sg+Par:%>%^A PxK ;
! does not handle valoaan vs. *salaaan

LEXICON long-par
 +Sg+Par:%>t%^A PxK ;

LEXICON short-ill
 +Sg+Ill:%>%^V n-PxK ;

LEXICON long-ill
 +Sg+Ill:%>h%^V n-PxK ;

LEXICON longer-ill
 +Sg+Ill:%>s%^V%^V n-PxK ;

LEXICON oldgenpl
 +Gen:%> n-PxK ;

LEXICON shortgenpl
 +Gen:%>e n-PxK ;

LEXICON longgenpl
 d-longgenpl ;
 tt-longgenpl ; 

LEXICON d-longgenpl
 +Gen:%>de n-PxK ;

LEXICON tt-longgenpl
 +Gen:%>tte n-PxK ;

LEXICON consgenpl
 +Gen:%>te n-PxK ;

LEXICON shortparpl
 +Par:%>%^A K ;

LEXICON longparpl
 +Par:%>%t^A K ;

LEXICON shortillpl
 +Ill:%>hi n-PxK ;

LEXICON shorterillpl
 +Ill:%>i2 n-PxK ;

LEXICON longerillpl
 +Pl+Ill:%>s%^V%^V n-PxK ;

LEXICON npg-cns
 +Sg+Nom: PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:%>t%^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>te n-PxK ;

! Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! ---------------------------------

LEXICON n-PxK
 :n K ;
 Px ;

LEXICON t-PxK
 :%>t K ;
 Px ;

LEXICON PxK ! only -nsA
 K ;
 Px ;

LEXICON PxxK ! also -Vn
 K ;
 Px ;
 Px-Vn ;

LEXICON Pxx
 Px ;
 Px-Vn ;

LEXICON Px
 +PxSg1:%>ni K ;
 +PxSg2:%>si K ;
 +PxSg3:%>ns%^A K ;
 +PxPl1:%>mme K ;
 +PxPl2:%>nne K ;
 +PxPl3:%>ns%^A K ;


LEXICON Px-Vn
 +PxSg3:%>%^Vn K ;
 +PxPl3:%>%^Vn K ;

LEXICON K
 # ;
 +Clt:%>k%^O # ;
 +Clt:%>h%^An # ;
 +Clt:%>p%^A # ;
 +Clt:%>p%^As # ;
 +Clt:%>kin # ;
 +Clt:%>k%^A%^An # ;




! =====================
! LEXICA FOR VERB ROOTS
! =====================


! -----------
! Auxiliaries
! -----------

LEXICON neg
 +Ind:e indneg ;
 +Imprt:%^Al impneg ;

LEXICON indneg
 +Sg1:%>n K ;
 +Sg2:%>t K ;
 +Sg3:%>i2 K ;
 +Pl1:%>mme K ;
 +Pl2:%>tte K ;
 +Pl3:%>i2v%^At K ;

LEXICON impneg
 +Sg2:%>%^A K ;
 +Sg3:%>k%^O%^On K ;
 +Pl1:%>k%^A%^Amme K ;
 +Pl2:%>k%^A%^Atte K ;
 +Pl3:%>k%^O%^Ot K ;


! -------------
! Regular verbs
! -------------

LEXICON 52
 +V+Ind+Prs:%> PN3suf ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>i%> PN3nosuf ;
 +V+Cond:%>isi PN3nosuf ;
 +V+Pot:%>ne PN3suf ;
 +V+Inf:%>%^A INF ;
 +V+Inf3:%>ma INF3 ;

LEXICON 53
52 ;
LEXICON 54
52 ;
LEXICON 55
52 ;
LEXICON 56
52 ;
LEXICON 57
52 ;
LEXICON 58
52 ;
LEXICON 59
52 ;
LEXICON 60
52 ;
LEXICON 61
52 ;
LEXICON 62
52 ; 
LEXICON 63
 +V+Inf:%>d^A K ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:%> PN3suf ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:%>i%> PN3nosuf ;
 +V+Cond:%>isi PN3nosuf ;
 +V+Pot:%>ne PN3suf ;


LEXICON 64
52 ;
LEXICON 65
52 ;
LEXICON 66
52 ;
LEXICON 67
52 ;
LEXICON 68
52 ;
LEXICON 69
52 ;
LEXICON 70
52 ;
LEXICON 71
52 ;
LEXICON 72
52 ;
LEXICON 73
52 ;
LEXICON 74
52 ;
LEXICON 75
52 ;
LEXICON 76
52 ;



LEXICON PN3nosuf
 +Sg3: K ;
 PN ;

LEXICON PN3suf
 +Sg3:%>%^V K ;
 PN ;
